Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1548.02
Retailer, defined.

Retailer shall mean any person engaged in business who has annual gross proceeds in this state of at least one hundred thousand dollars resulting from the sales of tangible personal property for storage, use, or other consumption or from the business of making sales at auction of tangible personal property owned by the person or others for storage, use, or other consumption of any of the products, including byproducts, falling into the categories listed in section 81-1560.02.

Laws 1981, LB 253, § 6;

Laws 1993, LB 203, § 6.
September 30, 2025